Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 5. Shareholders and Records.
Sec. 10.06.433.
Annual report to shareholders; content; financial statement on request.

The board shall send an annual report to the shareholders not later than 180 days after the close of the fiscal year or the date on which notice of the annual meeting in the next fiscal year is sent under AS

10.06.410

, whichever is first. A corporation with less than 100 holders of record of its shares, as determined under AS

10.06.408

, is exempt from this annual requirement unless its articles or bylaws impose the requirement. The annual report must contain a balance sheet as of the end of the fiscal year and an income statement and statement of changes in financial position for the fiscal year, accompanied by a report on the fiscal year by independent accountants or, if there is no such report, the certificate of an authorized officer of the corporation that the statements were prepared without audit from the books and records of the corporation.

In addition to the financial statement required by (a) of this section, unless a corporation has a nonexempt class of securities registered under 15 U.S.C. 78l (Securities Exchange Act of 1934) or files reports under 43 U.S.C. 1606(c), 1607(c), and 1625 (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act), the annual report of a corporation having 100 or more holders of record of its shares must also briefly describe

all transactions, excluding compensation of officers and directors, during the previous fiscal year involving an amount in excess of $40,000, other than contracts let at competitive bid or services rendered at prices regulated by law, to which the corporation or its parent or subsidiary was a party, and in which a director or officer of the corporation or of a subsidiary or, if known to the corporation, its parent, or subsidiary, a holder of more than 10 percent of the outstanding voting shares of the corporation had a direct or indirect material interest; the report must include the name of the person, the person’s relationship to the corporation, the nature of the person’s interest in the transaction and, if practicable, the amount of the interest; in the case of a transaction with a partnership of which the person is a partner, only the interest of the partnership need be stated; a report is not required in the case of transactions approved by the shareholders under AS

10.06.478

;

the amount and circumstances of indemnifications or advances aggregating more than $10,000 paid during the fiscal year to an officer or director of the corporation under AS

10.06.490

; a report is not required in the case of indemnification approved by the shareholders under AS

10.06.490(d)(3)

.

A shareholder or shareholders holding at least five percent of the outstanding shares of a class of a corporation may make a written request to the corporation for an income statement of the corporation for the three-month, six-month, or nine-month period of the current fiscal year ended more than 30 days before the date of the request and a balance sheet of the corporation as of the end of the period and, in addition, if an annual report for the last fiscal year has not been sent to shareholders, the statements required by (a) of this section for the last fiscal year. The statement shall be delivered or mailed to the person making the request within 30 days of the request. A copy of the statements shall be kept on file in the principal office of the corporation for 12 months and they shall be exhibited at all reasonable times to a shareholder demanding an examination of the statements or a copy of the statements shall be mailed to that shareholder.

A corporation shall, upon the written request of a shareholder, mail to the shareholder a copy of the last annual, semiannual, or quarterly income statement that it has prepared and a balance sheet as of the end of the period.

The quarterly income statements and balance sheets referred to in this section shall be accompanied by any report on those statements by independent accountants engaged by the corporation or the certificate of an authorized officer of the corporation that the financial statements were prepared without audit from the books and records of the corporation.

A corporation that neglects, fails, or refuses to prepare or submit the financial statements required by this section is subject to a penalty of $25 for each day that the failure or refusal continues, beginning 30 days after receipt of written request that the duty be performed from one entitled to make the request, up to a maximum of $1,500. The penalty shall be paid to the shareholder or shareholders jointly making the request for performance of the duty or duties imposed by this section. In addition to this penalty, the court may enforce the duty of making and mailing or delivering the information and financial statements required by this section and, for good cause shown, may extend the time limits under this section.

This section applies to a domestic corporation and a foreign corporation having its principal executive office in this state or customarily holding meetings of its board in this state.

A corporation may deliver the annual report required under (a) of this section

by mail;

in person; or

by electronic transmission, or by a posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice of the specific posting to the shareholder, if the corporation has received a writing or an electronic transmission from the shareholder that includes information demonstrating that the shareholder authorized the electronic transmission and delivery of annual reports by electronic transmission or electronic posting.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 32 ch 82 SLA 1989; am § 6 ch 103 SLA 2002; am § 14 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in the introductory language of (b), substituted “15 U.S.C. 78l (Securities Exchange Act of 1934) or files reports under 43 U.S.C. 1606(c), 1607(c), and 1625 (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act)” for “Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or files reports under Sections 7(c), 8(c), and 28 of the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act”.

Sec. 10.06.435.
Shareholders’ derivative action.

An action may be brought in the right of a domestic or foreign corporation to procure a judgment in its favor by a holder of shares of the corporation, of voting trust certificates of the corporation, or of a beneficial interest in shares of the corporation.

In a derivative action, the complaint shall be verified and must allege that the plaintiff was a shareholder, of record or beneficially, or the holder of voting trust certificates at the time or during any part of the transaction of which the plaintiff complains or that the plaintiff ’s shares or voting trust certificates devolved upon the plaintiff by operation of law from a holder who was a holder at the time or during any part of the transaction complained of. A shareholder who does not meet the requirements of this section may be allowed in the discretion of the court to maintain the action on a preliminary showing to and determination by the court, by motion and after a hearing at which the court considers evidence, by affidavit or testimony, as it considers material, that

there is a strong prima facie case in favor of the claim asserted on behalf of the corporation;

no other similar action has been or is likely to be instituted;

the plaintiff acquired the shares before there was disclosure to the public or to the plaintiff of the wrongdoing of which the plaintiff complains;

unless the action can be maintained the defendant may retain a gain derived from the defendant’s wilful breach of a fiduciary duty; and

the requested relief will not result in unjust enrichment of the corporation or a shareholder of the corporation.

Unless excused on grounds that a majority of the directors is implicated in or under the direct or indirect control of a person who is implicated in the injury to the corporation, before an action in the right of a domestic or foreign corporation is instituted a plaintiff who has standing under (b) of this section shall make a formal demand upon the board to secure the action the plaintiff desires.

If a shareholder fails to make a formal demand under (c) of this section the complaint shall state with particularity the facts establishing excuse under (c) of this section. In a motion to dismiss for failure to make demand on the board the shareholder shall have the burden to establish excuse.

In a case in which demand on the board is made under (c) of this section, a decision by the board that, in its business judgment, the litigation would not be in the best interest of the corporation terminates the right created by (a) of this section.

In a case in which demand on the board is excused under (c) of this section or the decision of the board under (e) of this section is rejected by the court as inconsistent with the directors’ duties of care and loyalty to the corporation, a plaintiff who has standing under (b) of this section shall have the right to commence or continue the action created by (a) of this section. Notwithstanding (c) or (e) of this section, disinterested, noninvolved directors acting as the board or a duly charged board committee may petition the court to dismiss the plaintiff ’s action on grounds that in their independent, informed business judgment the action is not in the best interests of the corporation. The petitioners shall have the burden of establishing to the satisfaction of the court their disinterest, independence from any direct or indirect control of defendants in the action, and the informed basis on which they have exercised their asserted business judgment. If the court is satisfied that the petitioners are disinterested, independent, and informed it shall then exercise an independent appraisal of the plaintiff ’s action to determine whether, considering the welfare of the corporation and relevant issues of public policy, it should dismiss the action.

A shareholder action otherwise in conformity with this section may not be dismissed because the alleged injury or wrong to the corporation has been ratified by the outstanding shares. A court may consider the fact of ratification in framing any order for relief to which it considers the corporation entitled.

In an action instituted or maintained in the right of a corporation by the holder or holders of record of less than five percent of the outstanding shares of any class of the corporation or of voting trust certificates for these shares, the corporation in whose right the action is brought or the defendants may at any time before final judgment move the court to require the plaintiff to give security for the reasonable expense, including attorney fees, that may be incurred by the moving party. The amount of the security may be increased or decreased from time to time in the discretion of the court upon a showing that the security has become inadequate or excessive. The corporation or other defendants may have recourse to the security in an amount as the court may determine upon the termination of the derivative action, whether or not the court finds the action was brought without reasonable cause.

A derivative action may not be discontinued, abandoned, compromised, or settled without the approval of the court having jurisdiction of the action. If the court determines that the interests of the shareholders or any class or classes of shareholders will be substantially affected by a discontinuance, abandonment, compromise, or settlement, the court in its discretion may direct that notice, by publication or otherwise, shall be given to the shareholders or class or classes of shareholders whose interests will be affected. If the court directs notice to be given, it shall determine which of the parties to the action shall bear the expense of giving the notice in an amount the court determines to be reasonable in the circumstances. The amount shall be awarded as special costs of the action.

If the derivative action is successful, in whole or in part, or if anything is received as a result of the judgment, compromise, or settlement of that action, the court may award to the plaintiff or plaintiffs reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney fees, and shall direct an accounting to the corporation for the remainder of the proceeds. This subsection does not apply to a judgment rendered only for the benefit of injured shareholders and limited to a recovery of the loss or damage sustained by them.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 33 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, in the last sentence of (f) of this section, “petitioners” was substituted for “petitions” to correct a manifest error in ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Cross references. —

For effect of the enactment of this section on Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure 23.1 and 82, see secs. 17 — 18, ch. 166, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.06.438.
Liability of shareholders, subscribers, and others arising out of shares.

A holder of or subscriber to shares of a corporation is under no obligation to the corporation or its creditors as holder or subscriber with respect to the shares other than the obligation to pay the corporation the full consideration for which the shares were issued or to be issued.

An assignee or transferee of shares, or of a subscription for shares, in good faith and without knowledge or notice that the full consideration has not been paid, is not personally liable to the corporation or its creditors for any unpaid portion of the consideration.

An executor, administrator, conservator, guardian, trustee, assignee for the benefit of creditors, or receiver is not personally liable to the corporation or its creditors for any unpaid portion of the consideration.

A pledgee or other holder of shares as collateral security is not personally liable as a shareholder.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, in subsection (a), “A holder of” was substituted for “A holder” to correct a manifest error in ch. 166, SLA 1988.